Vermont, session 2025-2026, H821.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 5023 is amended to read:
§ 5023. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Advisory Council. There is established the Artificial Intelligence
Advisory Council to provide advice and counsel to the Director of the Division
of Artificial Intelligence with regard to the Division’s responsibilities to review
all aspects of artificial intelligence systems developed, employed, or procured
in State government. The Council, in consultation with the Director of the
Division, shall also engage in public outreach and education on artificial
intelligence.
(b) Members.
(1) Members. The Advisory Council shall be composed of the
following members:
(A) the Secretary of Digital Services or designee;
(B) the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or
designee;
(C) the Commissioner of Public Safety or designee;
(D) the Executive Director of the American Civil Liberties Union of
Vermont or designee;
(E) one member who is an expert in constitutional and legal rights,
appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court;
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 3 of 10
(F) one member with experience in the field of ethics and human
rights, appointed by the Governor Board of Trustees of the Vermont chapter of
the National Association of Social Workers;
(G) one member who is an academic at a postsecondary institute,
appointed by the Vermont Academy of Science and Engineering;
(H) the Commissioner of Health or designee one member with
experience in public education, appointed by the Board of Directors of the
Vermont-National Education Association;
(I) the Executive Director of Racial Equity or designee; and
(J) the Attorney General or designee;
(K) the State Treasurer or designee;
(L) one member with experience in health care, appointed by the
Board of the Vermont Medical Society; and
(M) the Secretary of Human Services or designee.
* * *
(h) Repeal. This section shall be repealed on June 30, 2027 2030.
Sec. 2. RESPONSIBLE AND ETHICAL USE OF ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE IN HEALTH CARE, HUMAN SERVICES,
EDUCATION, PUBLIC PARTICIPATION, AND PUBLIC
FINANCE; REPORT
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 4 of 10
(a) Task. The Artificial Intelligence Advisory Council, in coordination
with the Director of the Division of Artificial Intelligence, shall:
(1) review the guidelines and recommendations from the American
Medical Association, National Association of Social Workers, National
Education Association, and other relevant professional organizations regarding
the use of artificial intelligence in the fields of health care, human services,
education, public participation, and public finance;
(2) research existing and potential uses of artificial intelligence in public
participation processes and in public finance; and
(3) create opportunities for public education and engagement in the
development of artificial intelligence policy.
(b) Report. On or before January 15, 2027, pursuant to the task set forth in
subsection (a) of this section, the Artificial Intelligence Advisory Council, in
coordination with the Director of the Division of Artificial Intelligence, shall
submit a written report to the General Assembly that:
(1) summarizes ways that government can promote the ethical and
responsible use of artificial intelligence technology in health and human
services and in education;
(2) proposes pilot projects that improves public engagement in public
finance using ethical and responsible artificial intelligence technology; and
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 5 of 10
(3) identifies any reasons for further delaying or removing the
prospective repeal of the Artificial Intelligence Advisory Council set forth in 3
V.S.A. § 5023(h).
Sec. 3. 9 V.S.A. chapter 118 is added to read:
CHAPTER 118. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
Subchapter 1. Disclosure Requirements
§ 4193a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Biometric data” means data generated from the technological
processing of a consumer’s unique biological, physical, or physiological
characteristics that allow or confirm the unique identification of the consumer,
including:
(i) iris or retina scans;
(ii) fingerprints;
(iii) facial or hand mapping, geometry, or templates;
(iv) vein patterns;
(v) voice prints or vocal biomarkers; and
(vi) gait or personally identifying physical movement or patterns.
(B) “Biometric data” does not include:
(i) a digital or physical photograph;
(ii) an audio or video recording; or
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 6 of 10
(iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or
an audio or video recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific
consumer.
(2) “Consumer” has the same meaning as in section 2451a of this title.
(3) “Generative artificial intelligence” means an artificial intelligence
technology system that:
(A) is trained on data;
(B) is designed to simulate human conversation with a consumer
through one or more of the following:
(i) text;
(ii) audio; or
(iii) visual communication; and
(C) generates nonscripted outputs similar to outputs created by a
human, with limited or no human oversight.
(4) “High-risk artificial intelligence interaction” means an interaction
with generative artificial intelligence that involves:
(A) the collection of sensitive personal information, including:
(i) health data;
(ii) financial data; or
(iii) biometric data;
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 7 of 10
(B) the provision of personalized recommendations, advice, or
information that could reasonably be relied upon to make significant personal
decisions, including the provision of:
(i) financial advice or services;
(ii) legal advice or services;
(iii) medical advice or services; or
(iv) mental health advice or services; or
(C) any other applications as set forth in rules adopted by the Office
of the Attorney General.
(5) “Regulated occupation” means an occupation that, in order to
practice the occupation in the State, requires an individual to obtain a
professional license or certification enumerated in Titles 3, 16, 20, or 26 of the
Vermont Statutes Annotated.
§ 4193b. REQUIREMENTS
(a) Disclosure. A person that uses generative artificial intelligence to
interact with a consumer shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the
consumer, if asked or prompted by the consumer, that the consumer is
interacting with generative artificial intelligence and not a human.
(b) Regulated occupations.
(1) A person providing the services of a regulated occupation to a
consumer shall:
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 8 of 10
(A) prominently disclose when the consumer receiving services is
interacting with generative artificial intelligence if the use of generative
artificial intelligence constitutes a high-risk artificial intelligence interaction;
and
(B) comply with all other requirements of the regulated occupation
when providing services through generative artificial intelligence.
(2) A disclosure described in subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection shall
be provided to the consumer:
(A) verbally at the start of a verbal interaction; or
(B) in writing before the start of a written interaction.
(c) Safe harbor. A person is not subject to an enforcement action pursuant
to section 4193b of this subchapter if the person’s generative artificial
intelligence clearly and conspicuously discloses to a consumer at the beginning
of and throughout the entire interaction of an interaction pursuant to subsection
(a) or (b) of this section that it is:
(1) generative artificial intelligence;
(2) not human; or
(3) an artificial intelligence assistant.
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 9 of 10
§ 4193b. ENFORCEMENT
(a) A person that violates this subchapter or rules adopted pursuant to this
subchapter commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of
section 2453 of this title.
(b) The Attorney General shall have the same authority under this
subchapter to make rules, conduct civil investigations, bring civil actions, and
enter into assurances of discontinuance as provided under chapter 63 of this
title.
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. § 2466e is added to read:
§ 2466e. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE AS DEFENSE
(a) “General artificial intelligence” has the same meaning as in section
4193a of this title.
(b) Upon a claim that a person has violated section 2453 of this chapter, the
person shall not be able to use as an affirmative defense that generative
artificial intelligence:
(1) made the violative statement;
(2) undertook the violative act; or
(3) was used in furtherance of the violation.
VT LEG #386168 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.821
2026 Page 10 of 10
Sec. 5. TRANSITION FOR ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE COUNCIL
All newly added members to the Artificial Intelligence Advisory Council
pursuant to Sec. 1 of this act (amending 3 V.S.A. § 5023) shall be appointed by
their appointing authority on or before September 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386168 v.1